California, session 20252026, AB2063.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 10248 of the Government Code is amended to read:10248. Public computer network; required legislative information.(a) The Legislative Counsel shall, with the advice of the Assembly Committee on Rules and the Senate Committee on Rules, make all of the following information available to the public in electronic form:(1) The legislative calendar, the schedule of legislative committee hearings, a list of matters pending on the floors of both houses of the Legislature, and a list of the committees of the Legislature and their members.(2) The text of each bill introduced in each current legislative session, including each amended, enrolled, and chaptered form of each bill.(3) The bill history of each bill introduced and amended in each current legislative session.(4) The bill status of each bill introduced and amended in each current legislative session.(5) All bill analyses prepared by legislative committees in connection with each bill in each current legislative session.(6) (A) Commencing with bills introduced during the 2027–28 Regular Session, all letters submitted through the Legislature’s internet portal in connection with each bill.(B) It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that letters made available to the public pursuant to subparagraph (A) do not disclose confidential information or otherwise infringe on individual privacy.(6)(7) All audiovisual recordings of legislative proceedings that have been caused to be made by the Legislature in accordance with paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 7 of Article IV of the California Constitution. Each recording shall remain accessible to the public through the Internet and downloadable for a minimum period of 20 years following the date on which the recording was made and shall then be archived in a secure format.(7)(8) All vote information concerning each bill in each current legislative session.(8)(9) Any veto message concerning a bill in each current legislative session.(9)(10) The California Codes.(10)(11) The California Constitution.(11)(12) All statutes enacted on or after January 1, 1993.(12)(13) A link to the list of state and local agency reports required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 9795.(b) (1) The information identified in subdivision (a) shall be made available to the public by means of access by way of the largest nonproprietary, nonprofit cooperative public computer network. The information shall be made available in one or more formats and by one or more means in order to provide the greatest feasible access to the general public in this state. Any person who accesses the information may access all or any part of the information. The information may also be made available by any other means of access that would facilitate public access to the information. The(2) The information that is maintained in the legislative information system that is operated and maintained by the Legislative Counsel shall be made available in the shortest feasible time after the information is available in the information system. The information that is not maintained in the information system shall be made available in the shortest feasible time after it is available to the Legislative Counsel.(c) Any documentation that describes the electronic digital formats of the information identified in subdivision (a) and is available to the public shall be made available by means of access by way of the computer network specified in subdivision (b).(d) Personal information concerning a person who accesses the information may be maintained only for the purpose of providing service to the person.(e) The Legislative Counsel shall not impose a fee or other charge as a condition of accessing the information that is accessible by way of the computer network specified in subdivision (b).(f) The electronic public access provided by way of the computer network specified in subdivision (b) shall be in addition to other electronic or print distribution of the information.(g) An action taken pursuant to this section does not alter or relinquish any copyright or other proprietary interest or entitlement of the State of California relating to any of the information made available pursuant to this section.